Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2308
Excavation, defined.

Excavation shall mean any activity in which earth, rock, or other material in or on the ground is moved or otherwise displaced by means of tools, equipment, or explosives and shall include grading, trenching, digging, ditching, drilling, augering, tunneling, scraping, and cable or pipe plowing or driving but shall not include (1) normal maintenance of roads if the maintenance does not change the original road grade and does not involve the road ditch, (2) tilling of soil and gardening for seeding and other agricultural purposes, (3) digging of graves or in landfills in planned locations, (4) maintenance or rebuilding of railroad track or facilities located on a railroad right-of-way by the railroad company or its contractors when such maintenance or rebuilding does not change the track grade, or (5) hand digging around the base of a pole for pole inspection as part of routine maintenance or replacement of a pole when the replacement pole is similarly sized and is installed in the existing hole.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 8.